Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 3 Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia

46-3-110.
Declaration of necessity.

Whereas certain political subdivisions of this state now own and operate electric distribution systems to serve their citizens, inhabitants, and customers by providing them electricity for all purposes; and whereas, if such political subdivisions are to furnish, and if the members of the public in the areas they serve are to receive, adequate service, such political subdivisions must have adequate, dependable, and economical sources and supplies of bulk electric power; it is declared that there exists in this state a need for an authority to function without profit in developing and promoting for the public good in this state adequate, dependable, and economical sources and supplies of bulk electric power and energy for the purposes expressed in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 1.

46-3-111.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authority” means the Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia and any successor thereto. Any change in name or composition of the authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any person under this article or impair the obligations of any contracts existing under this article.

“Bond anticipation notes” or “notes” means short-term obligations issued after validation of bonds and in anticipation of the issuance of the bonds as validated.

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means any bonds issued by the authority under this article, including refunding bonds.

“Cost of project” or “cost of construction” means all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of such project and facilities related thereto, including land and any rights or undivided interests therein, easements, franchises, water rights, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates, and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the preparation of applications therefor, and including all machinery and equipment, including equipment for use in connection with such construction, and the initial fuel supply acquired for such project; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of such project in operation; costs of engineering, architectural, and legal services; costs of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized by this article. All funds paid or advanced for any of the purposes mentioned in this paragraph by political subdivisions contracting with the authority prior to the issuance of any of the authority’s bonds or notes may be refunded to such political subdivisions out of the proceeds of any bonds or notes so issued. The costs of any project may also include a fund or funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, a fuel reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the purposes mentioned in this paragraph shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds or notes issued under this article for such project.

“Election committee” means the Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia Membership Election Committee, as created in Code Section 46-3-113.

“Project,” “undertaking,” or “facility” means electric generation and transmission lines and works and all property, whether real or personal, of every kind and nature material or pertinent thereto or necessary therefor which may be used or useful in the development of electric power and energy and in the supplying of such electric power and energy to all those entities contracting with the authority therefor. These terms may include a divided or undivided interest in any electric generation or transmission facility in which the authority participates as an owner in common with others. These terms may be used interchangeably.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 5.

46-3-112.
Creation of authority; status of authority as instrumentality of state; location of principal office and legal situs or residence of authority.

There is created a public body corporate and politic to be known as the Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, which shall be a public corporation of the State of Georgia and shall have a perpetual existence. This authority, however, shall not be a state institution nor a department or agency of the state but shall be an instrumentality of the state, a mere creature of the state, having distinct corporate entity and being exempt from Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50. The authority shall have its principal office in Fulton County, and its legal situs or residence for the purpose of this article shall be Fulton County.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1200, § 1.

46-3-113.
Number of members of authority; creation of Municipal Electric Committee of Georgia Membership Election Committee; designation of members; selection of officers; receiving of nominations, election and terms of first members of authority.

The authority shall consist of nine members. The first nine members shall be elected as provided in this Code section.

On or before June 16, 1975, each of those political subdivisions which have, prior to such date, by proper resolution of their respective governing bodies, declared their intention to contract with the authority for the purchase of electric power and energy (other than for short-term purchases) shall designate one person, who shall be a resident of such political subdivision, as its representative on a body to be known as the Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia Membership Election Committee, provided that at least five political subdivisions have declared their intention to contract with the authority. All such resolutions of declaration of intention to contract with the authority shall be presented to the election committee at its first meeting, which shall be held in the office of the Georgia Municipal Association at 11:00 A.M. on Monday, June 22, 1975.

At its first meeting, the election committee shall organize and shall elect a chairman and such other officers as may be desirable in the determination of the election committee. The election committee shall then determine the sufficiency of the resolutions presented to it and shall determine the number of votes (including fractions thereof) which each representative to the election committee shall be entitled to cast in accordance with Code Section 46-3-117. Nominations for membership on the authority shall then be received by the election committee prior to adjournment of its first meeting.

The election committee shall then meet for the second time on Monday, June 29, 1975, at the same time and place to receive any other nominations to the authority that may be made. A vote shall then be taken; and the nine nominees receiving the largest number of votes cast by a quorum of the election committee, as such quorum is determined by subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-117, shall be declared the first nine members of the authority. Insofar as may be consistent with the remaining provisions of this Code section, in the election of the first nine members, the three nominees receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected to terms of three years; the three nominees receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to terms of two years; and the three nominees receiving the next highest number of votes shall be elected to terms of one year. Any tie votes shall be resolved by lot in such manner as shall be prescribed by the election committee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section to the contrary, in the event it should be mathematically necessary in the election of the members of the authority for two members to be residents of the same political subdivision, then one of the two members who are residents of the same political subdivision shall be elected for an initial term of one year. In the event there are four political subdivisions from which two residents must be elected, one of the residents of one of such political subdivisions shall be elected for an initial term of two years.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-114.
Residency requirements for authority members; ineligibility of election committee representatives for membership; eligibility of members to succeed themselves.

Each member of the authority shall be a resident of one of the political subdivisions represented on the election committee, but, insofar as is mathematically possible, no two members shall reside in the same political subdivision. Representatives to the election committee shall not be eligible for membership on the authority. Members shall be eligible to succeed themselves.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-115.
Terms of authority members generally; time of meeting of election committee prior to annual meeting of authority.

Upon the expiration of the terms of the first members of the authority, members shall be elected for three-year terms, provided that in the year in which a member’s term is to expire, the term shall not expire until the adjournment of the annual meeting for that year and until a successor is elected. The election committee shall meet at a date not more than 30 days prior to each annual meeting of the authority and shall elect members to fill the terms which will expire at the conclusion of such annual meeting.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

Cross references.

Annual meeting of authority, §

46-3-121

.

46-3-116.
Selection of additional representatives to election committee by political subdivisions subsequently contracting with authority.

Each political subdivision contracting with the authority (other than for short-term purchases) following the election of the first nine members of the authority shall designate a representative to the election committee no more than 30 days following the execution of such contract by and between the authority and such political subdivision. The term of such additional representative shall begin with the next meeting of the election committee.

Representatives to the election committee shall serve at the pleasure of the governing body of the political subdivision which appointed them.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-117.
Manner of distribution of votes among representatives to election committee; quorum of election committee.

In elections held by the election committee to elect members to the authority, each political subdivision entitled to representation on the election committee shall have and shall be entitled to have its representative on the election committee cast one whole vote plus an additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to be determined as provided in this subsection. The percentage which is arrived at by dividing the number of kilowatt hours taken from Georgia Power Company by each such political subdivision during the immediately preceding calendar year by the total number of kilowatt hours taken from Georgia Power Company by all such political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year shall be determined; and each such percentage shall then be applied to a total number of votes equal to the total number of political subdivisions entitled to representation on the election committee. The resulting figure, calculated to the nearest one-thousandth, shall be the additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to which each respective political subdivision is entitled.

At such time as facilities of the authority are placed in commercial operation as determined by the authority and energy is being supplied by the authority to political subdivisions contracting with the authority, then and thereafter each such political subdivision entitled to representation on the election committee shall have and shall be entitled to have its representative on the election committee cast one whole vote plus an additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to be determined as provided in this subsection. The percentage which is arrived at by dividing the number of kilowatt hours taken from the authority by each such political subdivision during the immediately preceding calendar year by the total number of kilowatt hours taken from the authority by all such political subdivisions during the immediately preceding calendar year shall be determined; and each such percentage shall then be applied to a total number of votes equal to the total number of political subdivisions entitled to representation on the election committee. The resulting figure, calculated to the nearest one-thousandth, shall be the additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to which each respective political subdivision is entitled by reason of energy taken. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, at the meeting of the election committee in the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which such facilities are first placed in commercial operation, as determined by the authority, and energy is being supplied by the authority to such political subdivisions, the period of time upon which the determination shall be made of the additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) to which the representatives of the election committee shall be entitled at such meeting shall be the remainder of the calendar year in which energy was first supplied to such political subdivisions, provided that such facilities have been in commercial operation, as determined by the authority, and energy has been supplied for a minimum of six months in the immediately preceding calendar year. If such facilities of the authority have not been in commercial operation, as determined by the authority, and if energy has not been supplied for a minimum of six months in the immediately preceding calendar year, such additional vote or votes (including fractions thereof) shall be determined by the number of kilowatt hours taken from Georgia Power Company in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section.

The presence at any meeting of the election committee of representatives entitled to cast two-thirds of the total votes to which the election committee shall be entitled shall constitute a quorum of the election committee.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-118.
Vacancies on authority.

Any vacancy in the membership of the authority shall be filled by a new member who shall be elected by the remaining members of the authority and who shall serve until the next meeting of the election committee. At the first meeting of the election committee following the filling of such vacancy, the election committee shall elect a member to fill the remainder, if any, of the unexpired term for which such vacancy was filled. Upon such election by the election committee, the membership on the authority of the member previously elected by the remaining members of the authority to fill such vacancy shall terminate.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-119.
Officers of authority.

The authority shall elect from its membership a chairman, a vice-chairman, a secretary-treasurer, and an assistant secretary-treasurer. Such officers shall serve for such terms as shall be prescribed by resolution of the authority or until their successors are elected and qualified.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-120.
Quorum of authority; action by majority vote; adjournment of meetings at which less than a majority is present.

At all meetings of the authority, the presence in person of a majority of the members in office shall be necessary for the transaction of business, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members then in office shall be necessary for any action of the authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of such majority to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. If at any meeting there is less than a majority present, a majority of those present may adjourn the meeting to a fixed time and place, and notice of such time and place shall be given in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-121, provided that if the time element of subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-121 cannot reasonably be complied with, such notice, if any, of such adjourned meeting shall be given as is reasonably practical.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-121.
Annual meeting of authority; special meetings; notice of meetings; waiver of notice; regular meetings other than annual meeting.

The annual meeting of the authority shall be held on the anniversary date of the first meeting of the authority unless the date, time, and place of such annual meeting shall otherwise be fixed by resolution of the authority, provided that any such date so fixed shall be in reasonable proximity to the anniversary date of such first meeting.

Special meetings of the authority may be called by resolution of the authority, by the chairman or vice-chairman, or upon the written request of at least three members of the authority.

Written notice of all meetings shall be delivered to each political subdivision contracting with the authority other than for short-term purchases, and to each member of the authority not less than ten days prior to the date of such meeting in the case of regular meetings and not less than three days in the case of special meetings.

Notice of a meeting of the authority need not be given to any member who signs a waiver of notice either before or after the meeting. Attendance of a member at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting and a waiver of any and all objections to the place or time of the meeting or to the manner in which it has been called or convened, except when a member states at the beginning of the meeting any such objection or objections to the transaction of business. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the authority need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meetings.

In addition to the annual meeting of the authority, regular meetings of the authority may be established by resolution of the authority; and no notice, other than notice of the adoption of such resolution to any member of the authority who was absent when it was adopted, shall be required for such meeting, except for the notice required by subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Editor’s notes.

The first meeting of the authority, as referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, was held on July 7, 1975.

46-3-122.
Reimbursement of members for expenses; making of rules and regulations by authority; employment of staff and personnel; designation of assistant secretary-treasurer.

The members of the authority shall not be entitled to compensation for their services but may be reimbursed by the authority for their actual expenses properly incurred in the performance of their duties. The authority shall make rules and regulations for its own government and may retain, employ, and engage all necessary staff and personnel, including professional and technical supervisors, assistants, and experts and other agents and employees, whether temporary or permanent, as it may require. Any one or more of such persons so engaged may be designated as an additional assistant secretary-treasurer of the authority and may be given the duties of keeping the books, records, and minutes of the authority, of giving all notices required by Code Sections 46-3-120, 46-3-121, and 46-3-123, and, in the absence of or in lieu of the secretary-treasurer, performing all other functions of the secretary-treasurer. Officers designated by the authority pursuant to this Code section shall serve at the pleasure of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-123.
Removal of authority members from office.

The election committee shall have the power to remove from office any member of the authority for cause after written notice and public hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-124.
Books and records generally.

The authority shall keep suitable books and records of all its obligations, contracts, transactions, and undertakings; of all income and receipts of every nature; and of all expenditures of every kind.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 4.

46-3-125.
Purpose of authority.

The purpose of the authority shall be to acquire or construct, or to acquire and construct, and to operate and maintain, or to cause to be constructed, operated, and maintained, electric generation and transmission facilities. In addition, it shall be the purpose of the authority to take all other necessary or desirable action in order to provide or make available an adequate, dependable, and economical supply of electric power and energy and related services to those political subdivisions of this state identified in Code Section 46-3-130 which may desire the same and, incidentally and so as to take advantage of economies of scale in the generation and transmission of electric power and energy, to other persons and entities.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 3.

46-3-126.
Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purpose and provisions of this article including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

To sue and be sued in contract and in tort and to complain and defend in all courts;

To adopt and alter a corporate seal;

To acquire in its own name real property or rights and easements therein and franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by the exercise of the power of eminent domain in accordance with any and all existing laws of the State of Georgia applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, including the power to proceed as a condemning body under Article 2 of Chapter 2 of Title 22 or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise; to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available; and to use such property, rent or lease the same to or from others, make contracts with respect to the use thereof, or sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any such property in any manner it deems to the best advantage of the authority and the purposes thereof. The power to acquire, use, and dispose of property provided in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided, which acquisition may result in the ownership of such property or any part thereof in common with any other party, whether public or private. Title to any such property of the authority, however, shall be held by the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public. The authority shall be under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this article except from the funds provided under the authority of this article and, in any proceedings to condemn, such orders may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the action as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned. If the authority shall deem it expedient to construct any project on lands which are subject to the control of the state or of any political subdivision or public corporation of the state, the Governor, in the case of lands controlled by the state, or the governing authorities of such political subdivisions or such public corporations are authorized to convey such lands to the authority for such consideration, not exceeding reasonable value, as may be agreed upon by the authority, as grantee, and by the Governor or by the governing body of such political subdivision or by such public corporation, as grantor, taking into consideration the public benefit to be derived from such conveyance;

To appoint and select officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts, fiscal agents, and attorneys, and to fix their compensation;

To acquire, by purchase or otherwise, in whole or in part, as provided in paragraph (3) of this Code section, and to place into operation and operate or cause to be placed into operation and operated, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others or as agent, electric generation and transmission lines, works, facilities, and projects; to provide, by sale or otherwise, an adequate, dependable, and economical electric power supply to political subdivisions of this state contracting with the authority pursuant to authority of Code Section 46-3-130; and, through such political subdivisions, to supply such electric power to the members of the public in the areas served by them; and, as agent for such political subdivisions, to secure power supply contracts and arrangements with other persons. The authority shall also have the power, which may be exercised either as principal or as agent, to manufacture, generate, store, and transmit electric current for light, heat, power, and energy; to manufacture, buy, sell, import, export, lease, or otherwise acquire and generally deal in electrical apparatuses of all kinds and machinery and devices and nuclear or fossil fuels for the manufacture, generation, storage, and transmission of electric current for light, heat, power, and energy; to purchase power at retail or wholesale from any other person; to purchase or construct part of the capacity of generation or transmission projects sponsored and owned by or in common with others, making any such purchase at wholesale or retail within or without this state; to contract for the purchase of power and energy from, or the sale of power and energy to, the United States government and electric utility systems either privately or publicly owned, within or without this state; to execute long- or short-term power purchase or sale contracts on terms which may include agreements with respect to resale rates and the disposition of revenues; to interchange, exchange, and purchase power and energy from any person; to erect, buy, lease, or otherwise acquire, operate, and maintain electric lighting, heating, and power projects; to transmit power both for itself and on behalf of others; to erect, buy, sell, lease, or otherwise acquire, maintain, and operate or cause to be maintained and operated plants, underground subways, conduits, poles, and wires above, upon, and under the streets, alleys, lands, and territories of political subdivisions, public or private corporations, or individuals; and to continue to sell electric power to political subdivisions of this state which are authorized to contract with the authority pursuant to Code Section 46-3-130 and to other persons and entities and, as agent for any or all of the same, to make power and energy otherwise available to them through arrangements with other persons, all in the exercise of the powers of the authority and to effectuate the purposes of this article;

To contract with the state and its agencies, instrumentalities, and departments, with those political subdivisions of the state which are authorized to contract with the authority pursuant to Code Section 46-3-130 and with private persons and corporations. This power includes the making of contracts for the construction of projects, which contracts for construction may be made either as sole owner of the project or as owner, in common with other public or private persons, of any divided or undivided interest therein;

To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by this Code section either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other parties or utilities, whether public or private. In any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of electric generation or transmission facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other parties, whether public or private. The authority may enter into agreements with respect to any such electric generation or transmission facility with the other parties participating therein, and any such agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions consistent with this article as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interests. Any such agreement may include, but need not be limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such electric generation or transmission facility by any one or more of the parties to such agreement, which party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto. Such an agreement may also include provisions for methods of determining and allocating among or between the parties the costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposals with respect to such facility. In carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement the authority may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent; and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement may be made binding upon the authority without further action or approval by the authority;

To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States government or the State of Georgia or any agency, department, authority, or instrumentality of either, upon such terms and conditions as the United States government, the State of Georgia, or such agency, department, authority, or instrumentality shall impose; to administer trusts; and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate, and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

To invest any accumulation of its funds and any sinking fund or reserves in any manner that public funds of this state or its political subdivisions may be invested, and to purchase its own bonds and notes;

To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this article and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, including:

Employment of professional and administrative staff and personnel and retaining of legal, engineering, and other professional services;

The purchasing of all kinds of insurance, including, without limitation, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property;

The borrowing of money for any of the corporate purposes of the authority, provided that obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds for which provision is made in this article shall be payable from the general funds of the authority and shall not be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds;

The power to indemnify and hold harmless any parties contracting with the authority or its agents from damage to persons or property; and

The power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability;

To issue its revenue bonds as provided in this article in evidence of its indebtedness incurred with respect to the powers described in this Code section, such bonds to be payable from the revenues, receipts, and earnings of the projects of the authority and other available funds thereof; to execute trust agreements or indentures; to sell, convey, pledge, and assign any and all of its funds, assets, property, and income as security for the payment of such revenue bonds; and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the owners thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 7.

46-3-127.
Policy as to nonprofit operation of projects by authority; fixing of rates, fees, and charges by authority.

The authority shall not operate or construct any project for profit except insofar as any such profit will inure to the benefit of the public. The authority shall fix the rates, fees, and charges consistent with this declaration of policy such as will produce revenues only in amounts sufficient, together with all other funds of the authority, to pay principal and interest on bonds and obligations of the authority, to provide for maintenance and operation of the authority and of its projects, and to maintain such reserves as shall have been created in amounts sufficient in the judgment of the authority for the security of the bonds and for the improvement, replacement, or expansion of the facilities or services of the authority or to provide fuel for its generating projects.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 12.

46-3-128.
Declaration of authority property as public property; payments by authority in lieu of taxes; tax exemption for authority property, income, obligations, and debt interest.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity performing an essential governmental function.

The property of the authority is declared, and shall in all respects be considered, to be public property. Title to the authority’s property shall be held by the authority only for the benefit of the public; and the use of such property pursuant to this article shall be and is declared to be for essential public and governmental purposes, that is, for the promotion of public general welfare in the matter of providing an adequate, dependable, and economical electric power supply in an effort to better the general condition of society in this state, which promotion is declared to be a public beneficence for the good of humanity and for the general improvement and happiness of society.

It is recognized, however, that removal from local tax digests of the value of all property owned by the authority might impose an unfair burden on many taxpayers whose property is taxable. In the interest of weighing these benefits and concerns and arriving at an equitable policy regarding treatment of authority property, the General Assembly finds and declares that equity requires that the exemption presently applicable to the authority’s property should remain in effect. However, the General Assembly also finds and declares that in the future the authority should rightfully make payments in lieu of taxes so that the authority may fulfill its good and public purposes without incidental harm to the state’s local governments.

With respect to tangible property owned by the authority and included in its project one and project two, as those projects are constituted as of March 25, 1980, or thereafter under the authority’s power revenue bond resolution and general power revenue bond resolution, and supplemental resolutions thereto, the authority shall begin making payments in lieu of taxes in such manner and amounts as provided in this Code section in the earlier of (i) the first year after all of the bonds issued by the authority to finance each such respective project have been fully redeemed or (ii) the year 2020.

With respect to tangible property acquired or constructed by the authority after March 25, 1980, and not included in its project one or project two, the authority shall begin making payments in lieu of taxes, in such manner and amounts as provided in this Code section, in the year 1981 or such later year as the authority first acquires or constructs such property.

In each year in which the authority is required by this Code section to make payments in lieu of taxes, it shall file a return within the same time and in the same form and manner as public utilities. The taxing authorities shall assess the tangible property of the authority which is made subject by this Code section to payments in lieu of taxes in accordance with the law and procedures applicable to public utilities and shall apply to such assessments in each year in which any such payments are due the appropriate millage levies of the state and of the political subdivisions in which such property is located in order to arrive at the amounts of the respective payments in lieu of taxes. The authority shall be notified of the amounts of the payments in lieu of taxes due and shall pay such amounts to the state and respective political subdivisions within the time in which payments of taxes by public utilities are allowed or required.

Except as specifically provided in this Code section for payments in lieu of taxes, all property of the authority, all income, obligations, and interest on the bonds and notes of the authority and all transfers of such property, bonds, or notes shall be and are declared to be exempt from taxation by the state or any of its political subdivisions.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 107, § 6; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1128, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 46/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted the extra subsection (b) designation preceding subparagraph (2)(A).